Connecticut, session 2026, SB00253.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 47a-21 of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective October 1, 2026):
4 (a) As used in this chapter:
5 (1) "Accrued interest" means the interest due on a security deposit as
6 provided in subsection [(i)] (h) of this section, compounded annually to
7 the extent applicable.
8 (2) "Commissioner" means the Banking Commissioner.
9 (3) "Escrow account" means any account at a financial institution
10 which is not subject to execution by the creditors of the escrow agent
11 and includes a clients' funds account.
12 (4) "Escrow agent" means the person in whose name an escrow
13 account is maintained.
LCO No. 1678 1 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
14 (5) "Financial institution" means any state bank and trust company,
15 national bank, savings bank, federal savings bank, savings and loan
16 association, and federal savings and loan association that is located in
17 this state.
18 (6) "Forwarding address" means the address to which a security
19 deposit may be mailed for delivery to a former tenant.
20 (7) "Landlord" means any landlord of residential real property, and
21 includes (A) any receiver; (B) any successor; and (C) any tenant who
22 sublets his premises.
23 (8) "Receiver" means any person who is appointed or authorized by
24 any state, federal or probate court to receive rents from tenants, and
25 includes trustees, executors, administrators, guardians, conservators,
26 receivers, and receivers of rent.
27 (9) "Rent receiver" means a receiver who lacks court authorization to
28 return security deposits and to inspect the premises of tenants and
29 former tenants.
30 (10) "Residential real property" means real property containing one
31 or more residential units, including residential units not owned by the
32 landlord, and containing one or more tenants who paid a security
33 deposit.
34 (11) "Security deposit" means any advance rental payment, or any
35 installment payment collected pursuant to section 47a-22a, except an
36 advance payment for the first month's rent or a deposit for a key or any
37 special equipment.
38 (12) "Successor" means any person who succeeds to a landlord's
39 interest whether by purchase, foreclosure or otherwise and includes a
40 receiver.
41 (13) "Tenant" means a tenant, as defined in section 47a-1, or a resident,
42 as defined in section 21-64.
LCO No. 1678 2 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
43 (14) "Tenant's obligations" means (A) the amount of any rental or
44 utility payment due the landlord from a tenant; (B) a tenant's obligations
45 under the provisions of section 47a-11; and (C) the actual reasonable cost
46 of changing the locks of the dwelling unit pursuant to section 47a-7b, if
47 the tenant has not paid such cost.
48 [(b) (1) In the case of a tenant under sixty-two years of age, a landlord
49 shall not demand a security deposit in an amount that exceeds two
50 months' rent.
51 (2) In the case of a tenant sixty-two years of age or older, a landlord
52 shall not demand a security deposit in an amount that exceeds one
53 month's rent. Any landlord who has received a security deposit in an
54 amount that exceeds one month's rent from a tenant who becomes sixty-
55 two years of age after paying such security deposit shall return the
56 portion of such security deposit that exceeds one month's rent to the
57 tenant upon the tenant's request.]
58 [(c)] (b) Any security deposit paid by a tenant shall remain the
59 property of such tenant in which the landlord shall have a security
60 interest, as defined in section 42a-1-201, to secure such tenant's
61 obligations. A security deposit shall be exempt from attachment and
62 execution by the creditors of the landlord and shall not be considered
63 part of the estate of the landlord in any legal proceeding. Any voluntary
64 or involuntary transfer of a landlord's interest in residential real
65 property to a successor shall constitute an assignment to such successor
66 of such landlord's security interest in all security deposits paid by
67 tenants of such transferred residential real property.
68 [(d)] (c) (1) Not later than the time specified in subdivision (2) of this
69 subsection, the person who is the landlord at the time a tenancy is
70 terminated, other than a rent receiver, shall pay to the tenant or former
71 tenant: (A) The amount of any security deposit that was deposited by
72 the tenant with the person who was landlord at the time such security
73 deposit was deposited less the value of any damages that any person
LCO No. 1678 3 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
74 who was a landlord of such premises at any time during the tenancy of
75 such tenant has suffered as a result of such tenant's failure to comply
76 with such tenant's obligations; and (B) any accrued interest. If the
77 landlord at the time of termination of a tenancy is a rent receiver, such
78 rent receiver shall return security deposits in accordance with the
79 provisions of subdivision (3) of this subsection.
80 (2) Upon termination of a tenancy, any tenant may notify the landlord
81 in writing of such tenant's forwarding address. Not later than twenty-
82 one days after termination of a tenancy or fifteen days after receiving
83 written notification of such tenant's forwarding address, whichever is
84 later, each landlord other than a rent receiver shall deliver to the tenant
85 or former tenant at such forwarding address either (A) the full amount
86 of the security deposit paid by such tenant plus accrued interest, or (B)
87 the balance of such security deposit and accrued interest after deduction
88 for any damages suffered by such landlord by reason of such tenant's
89 failure to comply with such tenant's obligations, together with a written
90 statement itemizing the nature and amount of such damages. Any
91 landlord who violates any provision of this subsection shall be liable for
92 twice the amount of any security deposit paid by such tenant, except
93 that, if the only violation is the failure to deliver the accrued interest,
94 such landlord shall be liable for ten dollars or twice the amount of the
95 accrued interest, whichever is greater.
96 (3) (A) Any receiver who is authorized by a court to return security
97 deposits and to inspect the premises of any tenant shall pay security
98 deposits and accrued interest in accordance with the provisions of
99 subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection from the operating income of
100 such receivership to the extent that any such payments exceed the
101 amount in any escrow accounts for such tenants. (B) Any rent receiver
102 shall present any claim by any tenant for return of a security deposit to
103 the court which authorized the rent receiver. Such court shall determine
104 the validity of any such claim and shall direct such rent receiver to pay
105 from the escrow account or from the operating income of such property
106 the amount due such tenant as determined by such court.
LCO No. 1678 4 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
107 [(e)] (d) A successor, other than a receiver, shall be liable for the
108 claims of tenants of such property for return of any part of such security
109 deposit which is or becomes due to such tenant during the time such
110 successor is a landlord. A receiver's liability for payment of security
111 deposits and interest under this section shall be limited to the balance in
112 any escrow account for such tenants maintained by such receiver in such
113 receivership in accordance with subsection [(h)] (g) of this section and
114 to the operating income generated in such receivership.
115 [(f)] (e) Any landlord who is not a resident of this state shall appoint
116 in writing the Secretary of the State as the landlord's attorney upon
117 whom all process in any action or proceeding against such landlord may
118 be served.
119 [(g)] (f) Any person may bring an action in replevin or for money
120 damages in any court of competent jurisdiction to reclaim any part of
121 such person's security deposit which may be due. This section does not
122 preclude the landlord or tenant from recovering other damages to
123 which the landlord or tenant may be entitled.
124 [(h)] (g) (1) Each landlord shall immediately deposit the entire
125 amount of any security deposit received by such landlord from each
126 tenant into one or more escrow accounts established or maintained in a
127 financial institution for the benefit of each tenant. Each landlord shall
128 maintain each such account as escrow agent and shall not withdraw
129 funds from such account except as provided in subdivision (2) of this
130 subsection.
131 (2) The escrow agent may withdraw funds from an escrow account
132 to: (A) Disburse the amount of any security deposit and accrued interest
133 due to a tenant pursuant to subsection [(d)] (c) of this section; (B)
134 disburse interest to a tenant pursuant to subsection [(i)] (h) of this
135 section; (C) make a transfer of the entire amount of certain security
136 deposits pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection; (D) retain
137 interest credited to the account in excess of the amount of interest
LCO No. 1678 5 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
138 payable to the tenant under subsection [(i)] (h) of this section; (E) retain
139 all or any part of a security deposit and accrued interest after
140 termination of tenancy equal to the damages suffered by the landlord
141 by reason of the tenant's failure to comply with such tenant's
142 obligations; (F) disburse all or any part of the security deposit to a tenant
143 at any time during tenancy; or (G) transfer such funds to another
144 financial institution or escrow account, provided such funds remain
145 continuously in an escrow account.
146 (3) (A) Whenever any real estate is voluntarily or involuntarily
147 transferred from a landlord, other than a receiver, to a successor,
148 including a receiver, such landlord shall withdraw from the escrow
149 account and deliver to the successor the entire amount of security
150 deposits paid by tenants of the property being transferred, plus any
151 interest accrued pursuant to subsection [(i)] (h) of this section. If at the
152 time of transfer of such real estate the funds in such account are
153 commingled with security deposits paid by tenants in real estate not
154 being transferred to such successor, and if at such time the funds in such
155 account are less than the amount of security deposits paid by all tenants
156 whose security deposits are contained in such account, such landlord
157 shall deliver to such successor a pro rata share of security deposits paid
158 by tenants of the real estate being transferred to such successor. (B)
159 Whenever any real estate is transferred from a receiver to a successor,
160 such receiver shall dispose of the escrow accounts as ordered by the
161 court which appointed such receiver. The order of such court shall
162 provide for the priority of the present and future rights of tenants to
163 security deposits paid by them over the rights of any secured or
164 unsecured creditor of any person and shall provide that the funds in
165 such account shall be delivered to the successor of such receiver for
166 immediate deposit in an escrow account for tenants who paid security
167 deposits.
168 (4) (A) The landlord shall provide each tenant with a written notice
169 stating the amount held for the benefit of the tenant and the name and
170 address of the financial institution at which the tenant's security deposit
LCO No. 1678 6 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
171 is being held not later than thirty days after the landlord receives a
172 security deposit from the tenant or the tenant's previous landlord or
173 transfers the security deposit to another financial institution or escrow
174 account.
175 (B) If the commissioner makes a written request to the landlord for
176 any information related to a tenant's security deposit, including the
177 name of each financial institution in which any escrow account is
178 maintained and the account number of each escrow account, the
179 landlord shall provide such information to the commissioner not later
180 than seven days after the request is made.
181 [(i)] (h) On and after July 1, 1993, each landlord other than a landlord
182 of a residential unit in any building owned or controlled by any
183 educational institution and used by such institution for the purpose of
184 housing students of such institution and their families, and each
185 landlord or owner of a mobile manufactured home or of a mobile
186 manufactured home space or lot or park, as such terms are defined in
187 subdivisions (1), (2) and (3) of section 21-64, shall pay interest on each
188 security deposit received by such landlord at a rate of not less than the
189 average rate paid, as of December 30, 1992, on savings deposits by
190 insured commercial banks as published in the Federal Reserve Board
191 Bulletin rounded to the nearest one-tenth of one percentage point,
192 except in no event shall the rate be less than one and one-half per cent.
193 On and after January 1, 1994, the rate for each calendar year shall be not
194 less than the deposit index, determined under this section as it was in
195 effect during such year. On and after January 1, 2012, the rate for each
196 calendar year shall be not less than the deposit index, as defined in
197 section 36a-26, for that year. On the anniversary date of the tenancy and
198 annually thereafter, such interest shall be paid to the tenant or resident
199 or credited toward the next rental payment due from the tenant or
200 resident, as the landlord or owner shall determine. If the tenancy is
201 terminated before the anniversary date of such tenancy, or if the
202 landlord or owner returns all or part of a security deposit prior to
203 termination of the tenancy, the landlord or owner shall pay the accrued
LCO No. 1678 7 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
204 interest to the tenant or resident not later than twenty-one days after
205 such termination or return. Interest shall not be paid to a tenant for any
206 month in which the tenant has been delinquent for more than ten days
207 in the payment of any monthly rent, unless the landlord imposes a late
208 charge for such delinquency. No landlord shall increase the rent due
209 from a tenant because of the requirement that the landlord pay on
210 interest the security deposit.
211 [(j)] (i) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, the
212 commissioner may receive and investigate complaints regarding any
213 alleged violation of subsections [(b), (d), (h) or (i)] (c), (g) or (h) of this
214 section. For the purposes of such investigation, any person who is or
215 was a landlord shall be subject to the provisions of section 36a-17. If the
216 commissioner determines that any landlord has violated any provision
217 of this section over which the commissioner has jurisdiction, the
218 commissioner may, in accordance with section 36a-52, order such
219 person to cease and desist from such practices and to comply with the
220 provisions of this section.
221 (2) The commissioner shall not have jurisdiction over (A) the failure
222 of a landlord to pay interest to a tenant annually under subsection [(i)]
223 (h) of this section, or (B) the refusal or other failure of the landlord to
224 return all or part of the security deposit if such failure results from the
225 landlord's good faith claim that such landlord has suffered damages as
226 a result of a tenant's failure to comply with such tenant's obligations,
227 regardless of whether the existence or amount of the alleged damages is
228 disputed by the tenant. For purposes of this section, "good faith claim"
229 means a claim for actual damages suffered by the landlord for which
230 written notification of such damages has been provided to the tenant in
231 accordance with the provisions of subdivision (2) of subsection [(d)] (c)
232 of this section.
233 (3) The commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance with
234 chapter 54, to carry out the purposes of this section.
LCO No. 1678 8 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
235 [(k)] (j) (1) Any person who is a landlord at the time of termination of
236 a tenancy and who knowingly and wilfully fails to pay all or any part of
237 a security deposit when due shall be subject to a fine of not more than
238 two hundred fifty dollars for each offense, provided it shall be an
239 affirmative defense under this subdivision that such failure was caused
240 by such landlord's good faith belief that he was entitled to deduct the
241 value of damages he has suffered as a result of such tenant's failure to
242 comply with such tenant's obligations.
243 (2) Any person who knowingly and wilfully violates the provisions
244 of subsection [(h)] (g) of this section on or after October 1, 1979, shall be
245 subject to a fine of not more than five hundred dollars or imprisonment
246 of not more than thirty days or both for each offense. It shall be an
247 affirmative defense under the provisions of this subdivision that at the
248 time of the offense, such person leased residential real property to fewer
249 than four tenants who paid a security deposit.
250 (3) Any person who is a landlord at the time an interest payment is
251 due under the provisions of subsection [(i)] (h) of this section and who
252 knowingly and wilfully violates the provisions of such subsection shall
253 be subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars for each
254 offense.
255 (4) No financial institution shall be liable for any violation of this
256 section except for any violation in its capacity as a landlord.
257 [(l)] (k) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a limitation upon:
258 (1) The power or authority of the state, the Attorney General or the
259 commissioner to seek administrative, legal or equitable relief permitted
260 by the general statutes or at common law; or (2) the right of any tenant
261 to bring a civil action permitted by the general statutes or at common
262 law.
263 Sec. 2. Section 17b-114 of the general statutes is repealed and the
264 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
LCO No. 1678 9 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
265 Subject to federal approval, as a condition of receiving a special need
266 benefit to cover the cost of a security deposit, a recipient of assistance
267 under the temporary family assistance program or the state-
268 administered general assistance program or the program of state
269 supplementation to the Supplemental Security Income Program shall
270 sign an agreement with the Commissioner of Social Services stating that
271 the security deposit and accrued interest, less the value of any damages
272 suffered by the landlord due to the recipient's failure to comply with his
273 obligations as a tenant pursuant to section 47a-21, as amended by this
274 act, shall be paid by the landlord to the Department of Social Services
275 when the recipient vacates the housing for which the deposit is paid.
276 The recipient shall notify the commissioner of the date such housing is
277 vacated. If the landlord claims the right to withhold all or part of the
278 security deposit or interest, the landlord shall comply with the
279 applicable provisions of section 47a-21, as amended by this act, except
280 any notice required shall be sent to the tenant and to the Commissioner
281 of Social Services. If the landlord fails to return the deposit to the
282 Department of Social Services or to account to the department for any
283 amount withheld within the time limits set forth in section 47a-21, as
284 amended by this act, the department may refer the matter to the
285 Department of Administrative Services for payment to the state of the
286 deposit, interest and such other damages as are available to tenants
287 under said section. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection [(d)]
288 (c) of section 47a-21, as amended by this act, for purposes of taking such
289 action on behalf of the state, the Department of Administrative Services
290 is not required to give notice of a forwarding address. A recipient of a
291 special need benefit to cover the cost of a security deposit who agrees
292 the deposit shall be returned to the department pursuant to this section
293 shall be eligible for a subsequent such special need benefit at any time
294 the recipient meets the eligibility criteria for the special need benefit for
295 emergency housing set forth in subsection (a) of section 17b-808.
296 Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 17b-129 of the general statutes is
297 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
LCO No. 1678 10 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
298 1, 2026):
299 (c) No claim shall be made, or lien applied, against any payment
300 made pursuant to chapter 135, any payment made pursuant to section
301 47-88d or 47-287, any moneys received as a settlement or award in a
302 housing or employment or public accommodation discrimination case,
303 any court-ordered retroactive rent abatement, including any made
304 pursuant to subsection (e) of section 47a-14h, or section 47a-4a, 47a-5 or
305 47a-57, or any security deposit refund pursuant to subsection [(d)] (c) of
306 section 47a-21, as amended by this act, paid to a beneficiary of assistance
307 under sections 17b-122, 17b-124 to 17b-132, inclusive, 17b-136 to 17b-
308 138, inclusive, 17b-194 to 17b-197, inclusive, 17b-222 to 17b-250,
309 inclusive, 17b-263, 17b-340 to 17b-350, inclusive, 17b-689b and 17b-743
310 to 17b-747, inclusive.
311 Sec. 4. Subsection (a) of section 36a-32 of the general statutes is
312 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
313 1, 2026):
314 (a) In connection with the examination of a bank under section 36a-
315 17, the commissioner shall assess the record of the performance of the
316 bank in helping to meet the credit needs of its entire community,
317 including low and moderate-income neighborhoods, consistent with the
318 safe and sound operation of the bank. The commissioner shall assess the
319 community reinvestment performance of a bank utilizing the applicable
320 methodology set forth in federal CRA. In addition, the commissioner
321 shall consider the following in assessing a bank's record of performance:
322 (1) The bank's record of offering escrow accounts for purposes of
323 compliance with subsection [(h)] (g) of section 47a-21, as amended by
324 this act;
325 (2) Efforts of the bank to work with delinquent residential mortgage
326 customers who are unemployed or underemployed to facilitate a
327 resolution of the delinquency; and
LCO No. 1678 11 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
328 (3) Written comments received by the commissioner.
329 Sec. 5. Subsection (d) of section 51-15 of the general statutes is
330 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
331 1, 2026):
332 (d) The procedure for the hearing and determination of small claims
333 as the same may be prescribed, from time to time, by the judges of the
334 Superior Court shall be used in all small claims sessions of the court. The
335 small claims procedure shall only be applicable to (1) all actions
336 claiming money damages not in excess of five thousand dollars, except
337 such procedure shall not be applicable to actions of libel and slander,
338 and (2) actions claiming loss or damages not in excess of fifteen
339 thousand dollars sustained by reason of (A) performance of, or offer to
340 perform, home improvement, as defined in section 20-419, by a
341 contractor holding a certificate under chapter 400, or (B) a contract for
342 new home construction with a new home construction contractor
343 holding a certificate under chapter 399a. If an action is brought in the
344 small claims session by a tenant pursuant to subsection [(g)] (f) of section
345 47a-21, as amended by this act, to reclaim any part of a security deposit
346 which may be due, the judicial authority hearing the action may award
347 to the tenant the damages authorized by subsection [(d)] (c) of said
348 section and, if authorized by the rental agreement or any provision of
349 the general statutes, costs, notwithstanding that the amount of such
350 damages and costs, in the aggregate, exceeds the jurisdictional
351 monetary limit established by subdivision (1) of this subsection. If a
352 motion is filed to transfer a small claims matter to the regular docket in
353 the court, the moving party shall pay the fee prescribed by section 52-
354 259. The Attorney General or an assistant attorney general, or the head
355 of any state agency or his or her authorized representative, while acting
356 in his or her official capacity shall not be required to pay any small
357 claims court fee. There shall be no charge for copies of service on
358 defendants in small claims matters.
359 Sec. 6. Subsection (b) of section 51-164n of the 2026 supplement to the
LCO No. 1678 12 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
360 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
361 thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
362 (b) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, any person
363 who is alleged to have committed (1) a violation under the provisions of
364 section 1-9, 1-10, 1-11, 2-71h, 4b-13, 7-13, 7-14, 7-35 or 7-41, subsection (c)
365 of section 7-66, section 7-83, 7-147h, 7-148, 7-283, 7-325, 7-393, 8-12, 8-25,
366 8-27, 9-63, 9-322, 9-350, 10-185, 10-193, 10-197, 10-198, 10-230, 10-251, 10-
367 254, 10a-35, 12-52, 12-54, 12-129b or 12-170aa, subdivision (3) of
368 subsection (e) of section 12-286, section 12-286a, 12-292, 12-314b or 12-
369 326g, subdivision (4) of section 12-408, subdivision (3), (5) or (6) of
370 section 12-411, section 12-435c, 12-476a, 12-476b, 12-476c, 12-487, 13a-
371 26b, 13a-71, 13a-107, 13a-113, 13a-114, 13a-115, 13a-117b, 13a-123, 13a-
372 124, 13a-139, 13a-140, 13a-143b, 13a-253, 13a-263 or 13b-39f, subsection
373 (f) of section 13b-42, section 13b-90 or 13b-100, subsection (a) of section
374 13b-108, section 13b-221 or 13b-292, subsection (a) or (b) of section 13b-
375 324, section 13b-336, 13b-337, 13b-338, 13b-410a, 13b-410b or 13b-410c,
376 subsection (a), (b) or (c) of section 13b-412, section 13b-414 or 14-4,
377 subdivision (2) of subsection (a) of section 14-12, subsection (d) of
378 section 14-12, subsection (f) of section 14-12a, subsection (a) of section
379 14-15a, section 14-16c, 14-20a or 14-27a, subsection (f) of section 14-34a,
380 subsection (d) of section 14-35, section 14-43, 14-44j, 14-49, 14-50a, 14-58
381 or 14-62a, subsection (b) of section 14-66, section 14-66a or 14-67a,
382 subsection (g) of section 14-80, subsection (f) or (i) of section 14-80h,
383 section 14-97a or 14-98, subsection (a), (b) or (d) of section 14-100a,
384 section 14-100b, 14-103a, 14-106a, 14-106c, 14-145a, 14-146, 14-152, 14-
385 153, 14-161 or 14-163b, subsection (f) of section 14-164i, section 14-213b
386 or 14-219, subdivision (1) of section 14-223a, subsection (d) of section 14-
387 224, section 14-240 or 14-250, subdivision (2) of subsection (e) of section
388 14-251, section 14-253a, 14-261a, 14-262, 14-264, 14-266, 14-267a, 14-269,
389 14-270, 14-272b, 14-274, 14-275 or 14-275a, subsection (c) of section 14-
390 275c, section 14-276, subsection (a) or (b) of section 14-277, section 14-
391 278, 14-279 or 14-280, subsection (b), (e) or (h) of section 14-283, section
392 14-283d, 14-283e, 14-283f, 14-283g, 14-289l, 14-291, 14-293b, 14-296aa, 14-
LCO No. 1678 13 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
393 298a, 14-300, 14-300d, 14-300f, 14-319, 14-320, 14-321, 14-325a, 14-326, 14-
394 330 or 14-332a, subdivision (1), (2) or (3) of section 14-386a, section 15-
395 15e, 15-25 or 15-33, subdivision (1) of section 15-97, subsection (a) of
396 section 15-115, section 16-15, 16-16, 16-44, 16-256e, 16-278 or 16a-15,
397 subsection (a) of section 16a-21, section 16a-22, subsection (a) or (b) of
398 section 16a-22h, section 16a-106, 17a-24, 17a-145, 17a-149 or 17a-152,
399 subsection (b) of section 17a-227, section 17a-465, subsection (c) of
400 section 17a-488, section 17b-124, 17b-131, 17b-137, 19a-33, 19a-39 or 19a-
401 87, subsection (b) of section 19a-87a, section 19a-91, 19a-102a, 19a-102b,
402 19a-105, 19a-107, 19a-113, 19a-215, 19a-216a, 19a-219, 19a-222, 19a-224,
403 19a-286, 19a-287, 19a-297, 19a-301, 19a-309, 19a-335, 19a-336, 19a-338,
404 19a-339, 19a-340, 19a-425, 19a-442, 19a-502, 19a-565, 20-7a, 20-14, 20-
405 153a, 20-158, 20-231, 20-233, 20-249, 20-257, 20-265, 20-324e, 20-329c or
406 20-329g, subsection (b) of section 20-334, section 20-341l, 20-366, 20-482,
407 20-597, 20-608, 20-610, 20-623, 21-1, 21-38, 21-39, 21-43, 21-47, 21-48 or
408 21-63, subsection (d) of section 21-71, section 21-76a or 21-100,
409 subsection (c) of section 21a-2, subdivision (1) of section 21a-19, section
410 21a-20 or 21a-21, subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 21a-25,
411 section 21a-26, subsection (a) of section 21a-37, section 21a-46, 21a-61,
412 21a-63, 21a-70b or 21a-77, subsection (b) or (c) of section 21a-79, section
413 21a-85 or 21a-154, subdivision (1) of subsection (a) of section 21a-159,
414 section 21a-278b, subsection (c), (d) or (e) of section 21a-279a, section
415 21a-415a, 21a-421eee, 21a-421fff or 21a-421hhh, subsection (a) of section
416 21a-430, section 22-12b, 22-13, 22-14, 22-15, 22-16, 22-26g, 22-30, 22-34,
417 22-35, 22-36, 22-38, 22-39, 22-39f, 22-49, 22-54, 22-61j or 22-61l,
418 subdivision (1) of subsection (n) of section 22-61l, subsection (f) of
419 section 22-61m, subdivision (1) of subsection (f) of section 22-61m,
420 section 22-84, 22-89, 22-90, 22-96, 22-98, 22-99, 22-100 or 22-111o,
421 subsection (d) of section 22-118l, section 22-167, subsection (c) of section
422 22-277, section 22-278, 22-279, 22-280a, 22-318a, 22-320h, 22-324a or 22-
423 326, subsection (b), subdivision (1) or (2) of subsection (e) or subsection
424 (g) of section 22-344, subsection (a) or (b) of section 22-344b, subsection
425 (d) of section 22-344d, section 22-344f, 22-350a, 22-354, 22-359, 22-366,
426 22-391, 22-413, 22-414, 22-415, 22-415c, 22a-66a or 22a-246, subsection (a)
LCO No. 1678 14 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
427 of section 22a-250, section 22a-256g, subsection (e) of section 22a-256h,
428 section 22a-363 or 22a-381d, subsections (c) and (d) of section 22a-381e,
429 section 22a-449, 22a-450, 22a-461, 23-4b, 23-38, 23-45, 23-46 or 23-61b,
430 subsection (a) or subdivision (1) of subsection (c) of section 23-65, section
431 25-37 or 25-40, subsection (a) of section 25-43, section 25-43d, 25-135, 26-
432 18, 26-19, 26-21, 26-31, 26-40, 26-40a, 26-42, 26-43, 26-49, 26-54, 26-55, 26-
433 56, 26-58 or 26-59, subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of section 26-61,
434 section 26-64, subdivision (1) of section 26-76, section 26-79, 26-87, 26-89,
435 26-91, 26-94, 26-97, 26-98, 26-104, 26-105, 26-107, 26-114a, 26-117,
436 subsection (b) of section 26-127, 26-128, 26-128a, 26-131, 26-132, 26-138,
437 26-139 or 26-141, subdivision (1) of section 26-186, section 26-207, 26-215,
438 26-217 or 26-224a, subdivision (1) of section 26-226, section 26-227, 26-
439 230, 26-231, 26-232, 26-244, 26-257a, 26-260, 26-276, 26-280, 26-284, 26-
440 285, 26-286, 26-287, 26-288, 26-290, 26-291a, 26-292, 26-294, 27-107, 28-13,
441 29-6a, 29-16, 29-17, 29-25, 29-143o, 29-143z or 29-156a, subsection (b), (d),
442 (e), (g) or (h) of section 29-161q, section 29-161y or 29-161z, subdivision
443 (1) of section 29-198, section 29-210, 29-243 or 29-277, subsection (c) of
444 section 29-291c, section 29-316 or 29-318, subsection (b) of section 29-
445 335a, section 29-381, 30-19f, 30-48a or 30-86a, subsection (b) of section
446 30-89, subsection (c) or (d) of section 30-117, section 31-3, 31-10, 31-11,
447 31-12, 31-13, 31-14, 31-15, 31-16, 31-18, 31-23, 31-24, 31-25, 31-32, 31-36,
448 31-47 or 31-48, subsection (b) of section 31-48b, section 31-51, 31-51g, 31-
449 52, 31-52a, 31-53 or 31-54, subsection (a) or (c) of section 31-69, section
450 31-70, 31-74, 31-75, 31-76, 31-76a, 31-89b or 31-134, subsection (i) of
451 section 31-273, section 31-288, 31-348, 33-624, 33-1017, 34-13d or 34-412,
452 subdivision (1) of section 35-20, subsection (a) of section 36a-57,
453 subsection (b) of section 36a-665, section 36a-699, 36a-739, 36a-787, 38a-
454 2 or 38a-140, subsection (a) or (b) of section 38a-278, section 38a-479qq,
455 38a-479rr, 38a-506, 38a-548, 38a-626, 38a-680, 38a-713, 38a-733, 38a-764,
456 38a-786, 38a-828, 38a-829, 38a-885, 42-133hh, 42-470 or 42-480,
457 subsection (a) or (c) of section 43-16q, section 45a-283, 45a-450, 45a-634
458 or 45a-658, subdivision (13) or (14) of section 46a-54, section 46a-59, 46a-
459 81b, 46b-22, 46b-24, 46b-34, 46b-38d, 47-34a, 47-47 or 47-53, subsection
460 [(i)] (h) of section 47a-21, as amended by this act, subdivision (1) of
LCO No. 1678 15 of 17

Raised Bill No. 253
461 subsection [(k)] (j) of section 47a-21, as amended by this act, section 49-
462 2a, 49-8a, 49-16, 52-143 or 52-289, subsection (j) of section 52-362, section
463 53-133, 53-199, 53-212a, 53-249a, 53-252, 53-264, 53-280, 53-290a, 53-302a,
464 53-303e, 53-311a, 53-314, 53-321, 53-322, 53-323 or 53-331, subsection (b)
465 of section 53-343a, section 53-344, subsection (b) or (c) of section 53-344b,
466 subsection (b) of section 53-345a, section 53-377, 53-422 or 53-450 or
467 subsection (i) of section 54-36a, or (2) a violation under the provisions of
468 chapter 268, or (3) a violation of any regulation adopted in accordance
469 with the provisions of section 12-484, 12-487 or 13b-410, or (4) a violation
470 of any ordinance, regulation or bylaw of any town, city or borough,
471 except violations of building codes, the health code or an ordinance
472 described in subdivision (5) of this subsection, for which the penalty
473 exceeds ninety dollars but does not exceed two hundred fifty dollars,
474 unless such town, city or borough has established a payment and
475 hearing procedure for such violation pursuant to section 7-152c, or (5) a
476 violation of any ordinance adopted by a town, city or borough pursuant
477 to section 14-224a, 14-390 or 14-390m for which the penalty does not
478 exceed two thousand dollars, unless such town, city or borough has
479 established a payment and hearing procedure for such violation
480 pursuant to section 7-152c, shall follow the procedures set forth in this
481 section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-21
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 17b-114
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 17b-129(c)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 36a-32(a)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 51-15(d)
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 51-164n(b)